Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3216
Respiratory care practitioner; subject to facility rules and regulations; when.

In the event a respiratory care practitioner renders respiratory care in a hospital or health care facility, he or she shall be subject to the rules and regulations of that facility. Such rules and regulations may include, but not be limited to, reasonable requirements that the respiratory care practitioner maintain professional liability insurance with such coverage and limits as may be established by the hospital or other health care facility upon the recommendation of the medical staff.

Laws 1986, LB 277, § 18;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,236;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1082.